California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 428, Sec. 6.   (AB 1074)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.9.

Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 19531 and Section 19549, the board may allocate up to 10 additional weeks of harness racing to the Los Angeles County Fair, or its lessee, to be raced at the fairgrounds in Pomona.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 428, Sec. 7.   (AB 1074)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.12.

Notwithstanding Sections 19482 and 19549, any weeks of harness racing or quarter horse racing allocated by the board to be raced at the facilities of a county fair that conducts its racing meeting pursuant to Section 19549.3 may be conducted by the fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.   (SB 721)   Effective June 25, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.13.

(a) Fairs that conduct racing meetings in the northern zone may, and horsemen’s organizations that represent horsemen who participate at fair racing meetings in the northern zone shall, jointly develop a program to provide for stabling and training facilities. This program shall be based on the anticipated inventory of horses and the number of available stalls and locations. 

(b) Participating fairs and horsemen’s organizations shall annually ratify an agreement which includes provisions governing the operation of the stabling and training facilities. The agreement shall also specify the conditions under which a participating fair may terminate its participation in the program. 

(c) Individual horsemen who elect to participate in the program shall be required to sign standard agreements with the participating fair governing the operation of the program. The agreements shall contain provisions that govern the operation of the program, including, but not be limited to, insurance coverage and payment of a security deposit.

(d) All agreements provided for in this section shall be approved by the board. 

(e) Each fair that conducts racing meetings in the northern zone may elect whether to participate in the stabling and training program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1211, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.14.

(a) Notwithstanding, Section 19489 or any other provision of this chapter, the board may permit the San Mateo County Fair to conduct live racing meetings at another site within or outside San Mateo County if its present site, Bay Meadows, closes.

(b) Live horse racing meetings conducted by the San Mateo County Fair, whether they are conducted within or outside of San Mateo County, shall be subject to the same provisions as are presently applicable to the San Mateo County Fair’s conduct of live horse racing meetings at Bay Meadows.

(c) If the racing association licensed in the year 2002 to conduct thoroughbred race meetings in San Mateo County is not licensed to conduct a horse racing meeting in that county in any subsequent year, the San Mateo County Fair may, subject to the approval of the board, conduct its racing dates at a facility operated by a thoroughbred racing association or fair licensed to conduct a meeting in the northern zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1063, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19489 or any other provision of this chapter, the board may permit the Solano County Fair to conduct live racing meetings at another site within or outside Solano County, if the site of its 2002 racing meeting is no longer available for horse racing in any subsequent year. Further, subject to the approval of the board, the Solano County Fair may conduct its racing dates at a facility operated by a thoroughbred racing association or fair licensed to conduct a racing meeting in the northern zone.

(b) Any racing meeting licensed to the fair pursuant to subdivision (a) may be operated by the fair or the fair may contract for the operation and management of the racing meeting with an individual thoroughbred racing association or fair, or a partnership, joint venture, or other affiliation of one or more thoroughbred racing associations or fairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 874, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.16.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may allocate racing days, pursuant to this article, to a fair in the northern zone to be conducted by the fair or, at the request of the fair, the board may license a racing association that was licensed by the board to conduct racing meetings in California prior to 2010 to conduct live horse racing at the fair during the dates allocated to the fair by the board.

(b) The live horse racing days, whether they are conducted by the fair or the racing association contracting with the fair, shall be subject to the same provisions of law as are presently applicable to a fair race meeting in the northern zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.   (AB 1303)   Effective March 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19549.17.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may permit the Los Angeles County Fair to conduct live racing meetings at another site within or outside the County of Los Angeles. Subject to approval of the board, the Los Angeles County Fair may conduct its racing dates at a facility operated by a thoroughbred racing association licensed to conduct a racing meeting in the southern zone.

(b) A racing meeting licensed to the fair pursuant to subdivision (a) may be operated by the fair, or the fair may contract for the operation and management of the racing meeting with an individual racing association that was previously licensed to conduct a racing
 meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 50, Sec. 4.   (SB 721)   Effective June 25, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Charity Racing Days [19550. - 19557.]

19550.

(a) The board shall require each licensed racing association that conducts 14 or less weeks of racing to designate 3 racing days, and each licensed racing association that conducts more than 14 weeks of racing to designate five racing days during any one meeting, to be conducted as charity days by the licensee for the purpose of distribution of the net proceeds therefrom to beneficiaries through the distributing agent. For the purposes of this section, a split meeting shall be considered a single meeting and the appropriate number of charity days shall be based on the total weeks of racing allocated for both periods of the meeting.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other provision of law, no racing association shall be required to pay to a distributing agent for the purpose of distribution to beneficiaries more than an amount equal to two-tenths of 1 percent of the association’s total on-track handle on live races conducted by the association at the meeting.

(c) This section does not apply to a fair, or to a licensed racing association conducting three weeks of racing or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19551.

As a condition of the issuance of the license, the board shall require that the licensee of such meeting shall conduct such charity day racing and shall furnish its plant, facilities and all personnel and property necessary for the conduct of racing on the charity days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19552.

All racing officials required by law or regulation to serve in connection with the meeting shall also serve, without further authority or designation, in their respective capacities and at the same rate of compensation in connection with the charity day racing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19553.

On such charity days the income from all operations carried on in connection with or resulting from the conduct of racing on such days, including income from parimutuel wagering, admissions, parking, program sales and concessions shall be income from operations on such charity days.

From the gross income from such operations on charity days there shall be deducted only the expenses incurred because of the conduct of racing on such days, but no deduction shall be made by the licensee for any overhead expenses or for expenses of the licensee which would be incurred irrespective of the conduct of the charity days racing.

The balance of such income after such deductions is herein designated as charity days’ net proceeds and shall be paid by such licensee to a distributing agent selected and qualified in accordance with this article. No profit shall be made, either directly or indirectly, from such charity days’ operations by the licensee of the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19554.

Except as provided elsewhere in this section, the distributing agent for charity distributions shall be a nonprofit organization or corporation, or nonprofit organizations or corporations, selected by the licensee of the meeting and approved by the board.

(a) Each distributing agent to be qualified hereunder shall conform to the then existing laws and regulations of this state and the United States, so as to be exempt or be entitled to exemption from the payment of any tax measured by income.

(b) Each distributing agent shall have not less than five trustees or directors. None of the individuals constituting the governing board of trustees or directors of the distributing agent shall be directly connected with, be a stockholder, or have any interest in the racing association that is the licensee of the race meeting. Each of the individual trustees or directors shall be a person who is, at the time, both a resident of this state, and an executive, officer, director, trustee, or member of the governing body or board, by whatever name the governing body or board may be known, of an organization engaged in civic, religious, charitable, educational, or veteran activities in this state.

(c) Each distributing agent shall adopt bylaws, shall provide for election to fill vacancies in the board of directors or trustees, and shall hold at least one meeting each year.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, with the approval of the board, a racing association whose board of trustees or directors is precluded by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, or by contract from receiving compensation for services in the capacity of trustee or director may act as its own distributing agent.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, with the approval of the board, a racing association may act as its own distributing agent provided it allocates and distributes for charitable purposes an amount at least equal to that specified in subdivision (b) of Section 19550 in accordance with Section 19555 and subdivision (b) of Section 19556.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 170, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19555.

Each licensee shall pay over such charity days’ net proceeds to such distributing agent as soon as practicable after the determination thereof, and such agent or agents shall hereafter distribute not less than 90 percent of the aggregate proceeds from charity days’ racing received and available for distribution by it to beneficiaries within 12 calendar months after the last day of the meeting during which such charity days were conducted. The balance, if any, of such aggregate charity days’ net proceeds not distributed within such 12-month period shall be distributed as soon thereafter as is practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19556.

(a) The distribution shall be made by the distributing agent to beneficiaries qualified under this article. For purposes of this article, a beneficiary shall be all of the following:

(1) A nonprofit corporation or organization entitled by law to receive a distribution made by a distributing agent.

(2) Exempt or entitled to an exemption from taxes measured by income imposed by this state and the United States.

(3) Engaged in charitable, benevolent, civic, religious, educational, or veterans’ work similar to that of agencies recognized by an organized community chest in the State of California, except that the funds so distributed may be
 used by the beneficiary for capital expenditures.

(4) Approved by the board.

(b) At least 30 percent of the distribution shall be made to charities associated with the horse racing industry. In addition to this 30 percent of the distribution, another 5 percent of the distribution shall be paid to a welfare fund described in subdivision (b) of Section 19641 and another 5 percent of the distribution shall be paid to a nonprofit corporation, the primary purpose of which is to assist horsemen and backstretch personnel who are being affected adversely as a result of alcohol or substance abuse. A beneficiary otherwise qualified under this section to receive charity day net proceeds shall not be excluded on the basis that the beneficiary provides charitable benefits to persons connected with the care, training, and running of racehorses, except that this type of beneficiary shall make an
 accounting to the board within one calendar year of the date of receipt of any distribution.

(c) (1) In addition to the distribution pursuant to subdivision (b), a separate 20 percent of the distribution shall be made to a nonprofit corporation or trust, the directors or trustees of which shall serve without compensation except for reimbursement for reasonable expenses, and that has as its sole purpose the accumulation of endowment funds, the income of which shall be distributed to qualified disabled jockeys.

(2) To receive a distribution under this subdivision, a nonprofit corporation or trust shall establish objective qualifications for disabled jockeys and provide an annual accounting and report to the board on its activities indicating compliance with the requirements of this subdivision.

(3) The nonprofit corporation or trust shall, in an amount proportional to the contributions received pursuant to this subdivision as a percentage of the total contributions received by the nonprofit corporation or trust, give preference in assisting qualified disabled jockeys who meet either of the following criteria:

(A) Jockeys who were disabled while participating in the racing or training of horses at licensed racing associations or approved training facilities in California.

(B) Jockeys licensed by the board who were disabled while participating in the racing or training of horses in a state other than California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (SB 977)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19556.5.

The board shall designate a nonprofit organization that is dedicated to research and development of improved safety standards for horse racing as a beneficiary qualified to receive a distribution pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19557.

Within the 12-month period specified in Section 19555, and prior to the payment of any charity days’ net proceeds to any beneficiary, the distributing agent shall submit the name of the beneficiary to the board for the board’s approval.

If the board does not disapprove of the beneficiary within 60 days after the submission, its approval shall be deemed to have been given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Regulation Generally [19560. - 19578.2.]

19560.

No person shall, without complying with this chapter, hold or conduct, or assist, aid, or abet in holding or conducting, any meeting in this State where there is horse racing with wagering on its results.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19562.

The board may prescribe rules, regulations, and conditions, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, under which all horse races with wagering on their results shall be conducted in this State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19563.

The board may adopt any rules and regulations of the United States Trotting Association, not inconsistent with this chapter, for the regulation of harness racing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19564.

The board may adopt any rules and regulations of the Pacific Coast Quarter Horse Racing Association, not inconsistent with this chapter, for the regulation of quarter horse racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19565.

Subject to the provisions of this article, the board shall by rule provide for the registration of all California-bred horses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19566.

The official Stud Book and Registry of the American Quarter Horse Association shall be recognized as the sole official registry for quarter horses. The board shall, however, by rule provide for the registration of California-bred quarter horses to enable compliance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

19566.5.

The Stud Book of the Appaloosa Horse Club as approved by the Appaloosa Horse Club shall be recognized as the sole official registry for Appaloosa horses. The Stud Book of the Arabian Horse Registry of America, Inc. shall be recognized as the sole official registry for Arabian horses. The board shall, however, by rule provide for the registration of California-bred Appaloosa horses and Arabian horses to enable compliance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 638.)
-------------------------------------------

19566.6.

The registry for registered California standardbred stallions shall be maintained by the California Horse Racing Board or its designee and shall be recognized as the sole official registry for stallions whose offspring are eligible to compete in the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

19567.

(a) Since the purpose of this chapter is to encourage agriculture and the breeding of horses in this state, a sum equal to 10 percent of the first money of every purse won by a California-bred horse at a horse race meeting shall be paid by the licensee conducting the meeting to the breeder of the horse. This section applies to any California-bred standardbred horse that is foaled on or after November 1, 1977, for all races, except the California standardbred sires stakes races.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a sum equal to 10 percent of the first and second place money of every purse won by a California-bred Arabian horse for first or second place at a horse race meeting shall be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.8, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, of Section 19617.8.

(c) Moneys from quarter horse racing derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

(d) Moneys from Appaloosa horse racing derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 19617.9.

(e) This section does not apply to thoroughbred horses or thoroughbred racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19568.

(a) Every licensee conducting a horse racing meeting shall, each racing day, provide for the running of at least one race limited to California-bred horses and California-sired horses, to be known as the “California-bred race.” If, however, sufficient competition cannot be had among horses of that class on any day, the race, with the consent of the board, may be eliminated for that day and a substitute race provided.

(b) For thoroughbred and quarter horse racing only, the total amount distributed to horsemen and horsewomen for California-bred and California-sired stakes races, and for races featuring California-breds upon the approval of the official registering agency, from the purse account, including overnight stakes, shall be not less than 10 percent of the total amount distributed for all stakes races from the purse account, including overnight stakes races, at that meeting of the racing association licensed to conduct live racing.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the thoroughbred racing associations in this state, in conjunction with the official registering agency, and owners and trainers organizations meet and report to the board on the establishment of a coordinated California-bred restricted schedule of stakes races designed to showcase California-bred restricted stakes races and qualify registered California-bred horses for the California Cup and the California Cup Day races. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the report be submitted to the board annually at least 60 days prior to the start of the racing year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19569.

In order to encourage and develop the racing of quarter horses, whenever a fair conducts a program of horse races on which there is parimutuel wagering, it shall, so far as practicable, provide a program of quarter horse racing on the same days that it provides a program of other types of horse racing, if sufficient quarter horses are available to provide competition in one or more quarter horse races.

Such quarter horse events may be in addition to the customary number of thoroughbred or standardbred events.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19572.

The board may, by rule, provide for the exclusion or ejection from any inclosure where horse races are authorized, or from specified portions of that inclosure, of any known bookmaker, known tout, person who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any law prohibiting bookmaking or any other illegal form of wagering on horseraces, or any other person whose presence in the inclosure would, in the opinion of the board, be inimical to the interests of the state or of legitimate horse racing, or both. No rule shall provide for the exclusion or ejection of any person on the ground of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19573.

Any person who, pursuant to a rule of the board, is excluded or ejected from any inclosure where horse racing is authorized may apply to the board for a hearing on the question of whether the rule is applicable to him.

The board shall hold the hearing either at its next regular meeting after receipt of the application at the office of the board nearest the residence of the applicant or at such other place and time as the board and the applicant may agree upon.

If, upon the hearing, the board determines that the rule does not or should not apply to the applicant, it shall notify all persons licensed under Article 4 of this chapter of such determination.

If the board determines that the exclusion or ejection was proper, it shall make and enter in its minutes an order to that effect. Such order shall be subject to review by any court of competent jurisdiction in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19574.

Any person who is excluded or ejected from an inclosure pursuant to a rule or rules promulgated pursuant to the provisions of Section 19572 is guilty of a misdemeanor if he thereafter enters the inclosure of any association during its horse race meeting without having first obtained a determination by the board that the rule or rules pursuant to which he was excluded or ejected does not or should not apply to him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19576.

(a) No person may furnish an audio or video recording of any quarter horse race occurring in this state to any other person either within or outside of the state for any commercial purpose, including the use of the recording in any type of video game, without first securing the consent of the racing association conducting the meeting, the organization representing horsemen and horsewomen participating in the meeting, and the board.

(b) No person may use any audio or video recording of any quarter horse race occurring in this state for any commercial purpose without first securing the consent of the racing association holding the meeting, the organization representing horsemen and horsewomen participating in the meeting, and
 the board.

(c) Any person whose consent is required under this section may file and maintain an action in superior court to obtain an injunction against the furnishing or commercial use of a recording of a quarter horse race in violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 7.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19577.

(a) (1) Any blood or urine test sample required by the board to be taken from a horse that is entered in any race shall be divided or taken in duplicate, if there is sufficient sample available after the initial test sample has been taken. The initial test sample shall be referred to as the official test sample, and the secondary sample shall be referred to as the split sample. All samples immediately become and remain the property of the board. The board shall adopt regulations to ensure the security of obtaining and
 testing of all samples.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to total carbon dioxide testing. The board shall adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to establish policies, guidelines, and procedures that include a split sample process related to total carbon dioxide testing. These regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations, and shall be replaced by final, permanent regulations within 120 days of their adoption.

(b) If the official test sample is found to contain a prohibited drug substance, the executive director, after consulting with and agreeing with the equine medical director that the official test sample contains a prohibited substance, shall confidentially inform the owner and trainer of those results. The owner or the trainer of the horse, upon being so informed, may request that the split sample be tested by an independent laboratory selected from a list of laboratories provided by and approved by the board. The owner or trainer of the horse shall pay the cost of testing the split sample.

(c) If the split sample test results fail to confirm the finding of the prohibited drug substance found in the official test sample, a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence pursuant to
 Section 603 of the Evidence Code of no evidentiary prohibited drug substance in the animal shall exist for purposes of this chapter.

(d) The executive director shall report to the board a finding of a prohibited drug substance in an official test sample within 24 hours of the confirmation of that prohibited drug substance in the split sample by the independent laboratory, or within 24 hours of
 waiver of the split sample testing by the owner or trainer. Any recommendation to the board by the executive director to dismiss the matter shall be by mutual agreement with the equine medical director. The authority for the disposition of the matter shall be the responsibility of the board.

(e) The executive director shall maintain responsibility for all test samples until the executive director refers the matter to the board. Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subdivision (a), the results of the tests from the official testing laboratory, the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory, and the independent laboratory shall be confidential until or unless the independent laboratory confirms the finding of the prohibited substance in the split sample or waiver of the split sample
 testing is given by the owner or trainer. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to be retroactive or affect the confidentiality of test results collected before January 1, 2021.

(f) The board shall post on its internet website the results of all nonconfidential official test samples within five business days of the confirmation of the split sample or waiver of the split sample testing by the owner or trainer.

(g) If the owner or trainer does not request that the split sample be tested within the time
 limits set by the board, the owner and trainer waive all rights to that sample and the board assumes all jurisdiction over the split sample.

(h) The board shall contract with the Regents of the University of California to be the primary drug testing laboratory performing the equine drug testing required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 252, Sec. 3.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19578.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board contract with the Regents of the University of California to provide equine drug testing. It is further the intent of the Legislature that to the extent that resources are available, the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory perform studies that may lead to the development of alternative or improved drug testing techniques.

(b) The Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory shall be located at the University of California at Davis in order to take advantage of the expertise of the veterinary specialists at that campus’ School of Veterinary Medicine. The laboratory shall be a part of the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory. Any capital outlay expenditures for the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory shall comply with Section 13332.11 of the Government Code.

(c) Funds collected under Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605) and Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 19610) for purposes of the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory and the Center for Equine Health shall be deposited in the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory and Center for Equine Health Account in the Fair and Exposition Fund. Funds deposited in that account constitute trust funds and shall be held in trust and may be expended only for the purposes for which those funds are authorized to be expended pursuant to this section. The funds designated for the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory shall be distributed to that system and shall be used to fund the construction costs, equipment costs, and for the repayment of the principal of, interest on, and costs of issuance of, and as security, including any coverage factor, pledged to the payment of, bonds issued or other debt service or expense, including repayment of any advances made or security required by any provider of credit enhancement or liquidity for those bonds or other indebtedness, or expense of maintaining that credit enhancement or liquidity, incurred for the purpose of constructing the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory, and for the operating costs of the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory. The funds designated for the Center for Equine Health shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California, Davis.

(d) Title to the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory shall vest in the Regents of the University of California. The laboratory shall be used in a manner that is consistent with Section 19577 and this section.

(e) The board shall contract to provide compensation for an equine medical director who shall advise the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory and be appointed by the Dean of the School of Veterinary Medicine under applicable university hiring rules with the advice of the board. The equine medical director shall be a member of the scientific advisory committee to the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory, and act as the primary advisor to the board on all matters relating to medication and drug testing, the practice of veterinary medicine within the areas regulated by the board, and the health and safety of horses within the inclosure.

(f) The budget for equine drug testing to be performed by the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory pursuant to Section 19577 shall be established as a permanent line item in the budget of the board. Operating budget requests shall be submitted annually by the university, and the board shall transfer funds appropriated for the operation of the laboratory and for equipment, in accordance with the contract, to the university.

(g) The board and the University of California may expand the services provided by the laboratory to the board in a manner that is mutually agreeable and is consistent with Section 19577 and this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19578.1.

If the equine drug testing is not conducted by the Kenneth L. Maddy Equine Analytical Chemistry Laboratory at the University of California, Davis, the board shall contract with the best qualified equine drug testing laboratory at a compensation rate that the board determines is fair and reasonable to the State of California and the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19578.2.

At the discretion of track stewards, horses that ship in on racing days may be subject to video surveillance for purposes of monitoring compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 2.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Equine Medication [19580. - 19585.]

19580.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations to establish policies, guidelines, and penalties relating to equine medication in order to preserve and enhance the integrity of horse racing in the state. Those policies, guidelines, and penalties shall include, at a minimum, the provisions set forth in this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board, in its testing efforts to determine illegal or excessive use of substances, recognize the greater importance of conducting complete and thorough testing of a lesser number of samples in preference to conducting less thorough testing on a greater number of samples.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19581.

No substance of any kind shall be administered by any means to a horse after it has been entered to race in a horse race, unless the board has, by regulation, specifically authorized the use of the substance and the quantity and composition thereof. The board may require that the official veterinarian approve, in writing, the administration of those substances in accordance with the regulations of the board. Any medication or equipment used to dispense medication that is located within the inclosure is subject to search and inspection at the request of any board official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19582.

(a) (1) Violations of Section 19581, as determined by the board, are punishable as set forth in regulations adopted by the board.

(2) The board may classify violations of Section 19581 based upon each class of prohibited drug substances, prior violations within the previous three years, and prior violations within the violator’s lifetime.

(3) (A) The board may provide for the suspension of a license for not more than three years, except as provided in subdivision (b), or a monetary penalty of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or both, and disqualification from purses, for a violation of Section 19581.

(B) The actual amount of the monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be determined only after due consideration has been given to all the facts, circumstances, acts, and intent of the licensee, and shall not be solely based on the trainer-insurer rule, as established in Sections 1843 and 1887 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) The punishment for second and subsequent violations of Section 19581 shall be greater than the punishment for a first violation of Section 19581 with respect to each class of prohibited drug substances, unless the administrative law judge, in findings of fact and conclusions of law filed with the board, concludes that a deviation from this general rule is justified.

(b) (1) A third violation of Section 19581 during the lifetime of the licensee, determined by the board to be at a class I or class II level, may result in the permanent revocation of the person’s license.

(2) The administrative law judge shall, after consideration of the circumstances surrounding a violation specified in paragraph (1), file a decision with the board that includes findings of fact and conclusions of law.

(c) Any person whose license is suspended or revoked pursuant to this section shall not be entitled to receive any material benefit or remuneration in any capacity or from any business activity permitted or allowed by the license during any period of its suspension or revocation.

(d) The penalties provided by this section are in addition to any other civil, criminal, and administrative penalties or sanctions provided by law, and do not supplant, but are cumulative to, other penalties or sanctions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19582.5.
